apertium-cym.cym.dix
    <pardef n="ails/efyll__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efyll</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afa</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afed</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afwn</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efwch</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afent</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afer</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afwn</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afit</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afai</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afem</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afech</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afent</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efid</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efais</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efaist</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afodd</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasom</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasoch</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasant</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afwyd</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afaswn</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasit</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasai</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasem</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasech</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasent</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afasid</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afaf</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efylli</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afa</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afwn</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efwch</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afant</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efir</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afwyf</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afo</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afom</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afoch</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afont</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afer</l>
          <r>efyll<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ailsefyll"><i>ails</i><par n="ails/efyll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="camsefyll"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ams</i><par n="ails/efyll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cydsefyll"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yds</i><par n="ails/efyll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gwrthsefyll"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wrths</i><par n="ails/efyll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sefyll"><i>s</i><par n="ails/efyll__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sefyll prawf"><i>s</i><par n="ails/efyll__vblex"/><p><l><b/>prawf</l><r><g><b/>prawf</g></r></p></e>
